Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 53.5
FEEDLOT CERTIFICATION

Section

35-53.5-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Feedlot Certification Act".

Source:

L. 98:

Entire article added, p. 267, § 7, effective August 5.

35-53.5-102. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Board" means the state board of stock inspection commissioners created in section 35-41-101 (1).

"Brand commissioner" means the brand commissioner appointed by the board pursuant to section 35-41-101 (2).

"Brand inspector" means an authorized Colorado brand inspector.

"Commissioner" means the commissioner of agriculture.

"Department" means the department of agriculture.

"Feedlot" has the meaning set forth in section 35-41-100.3 (2).

Source:

L. 98:

Entire article added, p. 267, § 7, effective August 5.

35-53.5-103. Rules.

To carry out the provisions of this article, the board is authorized to adopt appropriate rules pursuant to section 24-4-103, C.R.S., on subjects that shall include, but are not limited to, the following:

Fees to fund all direct and indirect costs of the administration and enforcement of this article;

Methods of separating cattle for purposes of this article;

Standards and procedures for certification of feedlots and for the issuance, renewal, suspension, revocation, and reinstatement of certificates;

The number and type of on-site inspections;

Records to be maintained by the owners and operators of certified feedlots;

Grounds for enforcement actions.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire article added, p. 267, § 7, effective August 5.

35-53.5-104. Delegation of duties - cooperative agreements.

The powers and duties vested in the board by this article may be delegated to qualified employees and agents, including without limitation the brand commissioner and brand inspectors.

The department may receive grants-in-aid from any agency of the United States and may cooperate and enter into agreements with any agency of the United States, any agency of any other state, and any other agency of this state or its political subdivisions.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire article added, p. 267, § 7, effective August 5.

35-53.5-105. Feedlot certification.

Any person desiring to have a feedlot certified and utilize the certification seal under the provisions of this article shall secure such certification from the board in accordance with this article and any rules promulgated pursuant to this article. The certification period shall be one year, beginning July 1 and ending June 30 of each year.

Feedlots separated by at least one mile will be treated as separate facilities, even if they are owned by the same entity. Feedlots owned by the same entity and not separated by at least one mile will be considered one facility for purposes of certification under this article. Each facility shall be certified individually.

To be eligible for certification, each facility must be organized and operated primarily for the finishing of terminal slaughter cattle. No animal interdiction or commingling of animals from any other facility shall be permitted.

Animals shall not be marketed as finished in a certified feedlot unless the owner of the feedlot verifies that the animals are destined to a packing facility registered and licensed by the United States department of agriculture. Animals leaving a certified feedlot for any other destination or purpose shall not be marketed as finished in a certified feedlot and shall be subject to all otherwise applicable brand inspection requirements.

Certifications are not transferable.

Certified feedlots shall be exempt from the fee waiver permit provisions of section 35-53-101 (2).

Animals in a certified feedlot shall not be exempt from any Colorado brand inspection requirement other than those exemptions contained in this article.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire article added, p. 268, § 7, effective August 5.

35-53.5-106. Application - fees - rules.

Each person seeking certification of a feedlot shall make application to the board on forms prescribed and furnished by the board. The board may reject any applicant who does not meet the minimum requirements for certification as set forth in rules of the board.

An annual certification fee in an amount determined by the board by rule shall accompany the application.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire article added, p. 268, § 7, effective August 5.

L. 2004:

(2) amended, p. 651, § 15, effective July 1.

35-53.5-107. Per-head fees.

The per-head inspection fee for a certified feedlot shall be fifteen cents less than the fee set by the board pursuant to section 35-41-104 for direct-to-slaughter cattle and seventeen cents less than such fee for all other cattle. All such fees shall be due and payable to the board by the fifth day of each month based on the number of animals shipped during the previous calendar month.

Each month, the owner of a certified feedlot shall remit two separate checks, each made payable to the board. One of such checks shall be in the amount of the per-head fee specified in subsection (1) of this section, and the other in the amount required to cover the Colorado beef board fee, the national beef promotion fee assessed pursuant to 7 CFR 1260.172, or both. Any payment received over ten days late shall result in the assessment of a penalty of ten percent of the amount originally due, not to exceed fifty dollars per late payment, plus interest at the legal rate specified in section 5-12-102 (1)(b), C.R.S., until paid.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire article added, p. 268, § 7, effective August 5.

35-53.5-108. Movement of cattle from certified feedlots - notice - inspection.

The board shall supply each certified feedlot with appropriate movement certificates in triplicate. One copy of each certificate shall accompany the slaughter animals to the packing facility, one copy shall be retained by the certified feedlot, and one copy shall be sent to the board together with the appropriate fees. The feedlot shall retain copies of the direct-to-slaughter certificates in a separate file, in numeric order, for audit purposes.

All certified feedlots shall notify the local brand inspector of all anticipated shipments going directly to slaughter, giving the inspector ample notice to inspect or audit the shipment at his or her discretion during daylight hours.

Any certified feedlot that has animals inspected immediately prior to shipment to slaughter and an inspection certificate issued by an authorized Colorado inspector shall be charged the applicable per-head fees, Colorado beef board fees, and national beef promotion fees. The certified feedlot per-head fee will not be charged in addition to the inspection fee. One copy of the inspection certificate shall be filed with feedlot copies of the slaughter movement certificates. The feedlot shall be responsible for the inspection fee, which shall be payable at the time of inspection on all animals inspected.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire article added, p. 269, § 7, effective August 5.

35-53.5-109. Movement of cattle into certified feedlots - notice - inspection.

All Colorado cattle arriving at a certified feedlot from origins in Colorado shall be accompanied by an inspection certificate or Colorado licensed market invoice, issued immediately prior to entry, or shall be inspected upon entry to the certified feedlot. All Colorado cattle that are inspected at the feedlot prior to entry for change of ownership or feedlot entry and that are not accompanied by a Colorado inspection certificate or purchase invoice shall be charged the regular set fees as authorized by section 35-41-104 and shall not be entitled to the discount provided in section 35-53.5-107 (1).

As used in this section, "Colorado cattle" means cattle that either were born in Colorado or were unloaded in Colorado before entering the feedlot.

Cattle received from another brand inspection state or province and accompanied by a current inspection certificate or licensed public livestock market purchase invoice issued immediately prior to shipment that identifies the animals by brand and that identifies the certified feedlot as the final destination shall be exempt from inspection requirements.

All cattle originating from a non-brand inspection area shall be accompanied by purchase and interstate shipment documentation as required by Colorado or the state of origin of the cattle, or both. The document shall include buyer, seller, date of purchase, number of head, sex, average weight, and brands if known. The feedlot shall notify the local brand inspector within twenty-four hours after arrival, and the cattle shall be held separately by source for a maximum of forty-eight hours after such notification so that the inspector may inspect or audit-endorse purchase and shipment documentation so as to establish identity satisfactory to the inspector. No commingling of shipments shall be allowed prior to inspection. The local brand inspector shall not collect any fee for this service.

Cattle received at the feedlot from any source that are rejected by the feedlot for any reason may be shipped out after proper required inspection. Cattle so rejected shall be considered Colorado cattle. These animals shall be kept totally separate from other animals, and no commingling shall be allowed.

The owner of each certified feedlot shall be required to keep a formal, auditable entry log of all cattle entering the facility. This log shall contain information including, but not limited to, the legal owner of the cattle, date of entry, number of head, sex, and lot number or numbers assigned. In addition, the log shall show the brand inspection or purchase invoice that accompanied the livestock upon entry. Such log shall be for the private use of the feedlot and the brand inspector and shall not be considered a public record under the Colorado open records law, article 72 of title 24, C.R.S. The log shall be kept at the certified feedlot at all times.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire article added, p. 269, § 7, effective August 5.

35-53.5-110. Audits - inspections - complaints.

The board or an authorized brand inspector may audit a certified feedlot at any reasonable time, with or without advance notice, to ensure compliance with this article or any rules adopted under the authority granted in this article.

The board shall determine the depth and frequency of any feedlot audit.

The audit of a certified feedlot may include physical inspection of animals in any area of the facility and may include any document required to verify head count, valid ownership, or legal entry into the facility.

Any person having reasonable suspicion of a potential violation may request, directly to the brand commissioner or his or her designated agent, an inspection or audit of a specific certified feedlot or pen therein. Such request may be granted or denied based upon rules of the board governing such inspection or audit. The person requesting such audit shall be responsible for the board's fees and costs incurred in conducting the inspection or audit; except that, if any violations are proven as a result of the inspection or audit, such person shall be reimbursed from the penalties assessed pursuant to section 35-53.5-113.

The owner of a certified feedlot may request an inspection of cattle held at the feedlot upon payment to the board of all applicable fees.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire article added, p. 270, § 7, effective August 5.

35-53.5-111. Enforcement - hearings.

The board is authorized to administer and enforce the provisions of this article and all rules adopted pursuant thereto.

The board is authorized to conduct hearings in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., and to use administrative law judges to conduct such hearings when their use would result in a net saving of costs to the board.

The board and, in the exercise of delegated authority, the brand commissioner, shall have full authority to administer oaths and take statements, issue subpoenas requiring the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, records, and other documentary evidence, and compel the disclosure by such witnesses of all facts known to them relative to the matters under investigation. Upon the failure or refusal of any witness to obey a subpoena, the board or the brand commissioner may petition the district court, and, upon a proper showing, the court may enter an order compelling the witness to appear and testify or produce documentary evidence. Failure to obey such an order of the court shall be punishable as a contempt of court.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire article added, p. 271, § 7, effective August 5.

35-53.5-112. Disciplinary actions - suspension or revocation of certificate - grounds.

The board, acting in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., may deny, suspend, refuse to renew, or revoke any certification if the applicant or certificate holder has violated any provision of article 43, 44, 53, or 54 of this title or has entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to or been convicted of any criminal act under title 18, C.R.S.

The owner of any feedlot whose certification has been suspended or revoked shall, upon notice, cause all animals leaving the facility to be inspected pursuant to section 35-53-105 and shall pay all required inspection fees at the time of inspection.

Upon the suspension or revocation of a certificate, all or part of the annual certification fee may be forfeited as determined by the board.

The owner of a feedlot whose certification has been revoked may reapply for certification at any time after the expiration of two years from the date of revocation and upon the payment of all required fees.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire article added, p. 271, § 7, effective August 5.

35-53.5-113. Civil penalties.

Any person who violates any provision of this article or of any rule adopted pursuant to this article is subject to a civil penalty, not to exceed one thousand dollars per violation, as determined by the board or a court of competent jurisdiction.

No civil penalty shall be imposed by the board unless the person charged is given notice and opportunity for a hearing pursuant to article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

All civil penalties levied and collected pursuant to this article shall be credited to the brand inspection fund created in section 35-41-102. All moneys credited to such fund pursuant to this article, together with any interest earned thereon, shall be retained in the fund and shall not revert to the general fund or any other fund except as may be directed by the general assembly, acting by bill.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to limit the authority of the board or any other law enforcement agency to investigate or prosecute violations of local, state, or federal law except as otherwise specifically provided.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to immunize any person from civil liability.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire article added, p. 272, § 7, effective August 5.

35-53.5-114. Estrays - stolen livestock - board to assist recovery.

The board shall assist the owner of any certified feedlot that, as legal purchaser, has inadvertently received an estray or stolen animal on any shipment received. Stolen livestock found at any inspection location shall be handled in accordance with section 18-4-405, C.R.S.

Animals found to be of questionable title shall be handled as estrays until clear and legal title has been established. At the time of entry into a certified feedlot, the officiating inspector shall notify the owner of the feedlot of any estrays or animals of questionable title and assist in clarifying title wherever possible.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire article added, p. 272, § 7, effective August 5.

35-53.5-115. Prohibited acts - no liability of state.

It shall be unlawful for any unauthorized person to reproduce, produce a facsimile of, or use a feedlot certificate in any fashion. Any person who violates this subsection (1) may be subject to appropriate civil or administrative proceedings or both.

The state assumes no liability for persons who misrepresent any product under the authority of this article.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire article added, p. 273, § 7, effective August 5.